Illinois, session 104th, HB3096.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The School Code is amended by changing Section 522-87 as follows: 6    (105 ILCS 5/22-87)7    Sec. 22-87. Graduation requirements; Free Application for 8Federal Student Aid. 9    (a) Beginning with the 2020-2021 school year, in addition 10to any other requirements under this Code, as a prerequisite 11to receiving a high school diploma from a public high school, 12the parent or guardian of each student or, if a student is at 13least 18 years of age or legally emancipated, the student must 14comply with either of the following:15        (1) File a Free Application for Federal Student Aid 16    with the United States Department of Education or, if 17    applicable, an application for State financial aid.18        (2) On a form created by the State Board of Education, 19    file a waiver with the student's school district 20    indicating that the parent or guardian or, if applicable, 21    the student understands what the Free Application for 22    Federal Student Aid and application for State financial 23    aid are and has chosen not to file an application under   HB3096 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 10900 LNS 20982 b1    paragraph (1).2    (b) Each school district with a high school must require 3each high school student to comply with this Section and must 4provide to each high school student and, if applicable, his or 5her parent or guardian any support or assistance necessary to 6comply with this Section. 7    Beginning with the 2025-2026 school year, each high school 8must designate at least one member of its staff as a contact 9for matters related to this Section, annually provide the 10individual's name and contact information to the State Board 11of Education and Illinois Student Assistance Commission in a 12form and manner that these agencies prescribe, and inform high 13school seniors that this individual is available to answer 14questions about this Section or to refer them to an 15appropriate resource, which may include, but is not limited 16to, the Illinois Student Assistance Commission. The contact 17shall serve as a designated point of contact for information 18from the State Board of Education and Illinois Student 19Assistance Commission related to this Section, including the 20free resources available to their students and schools to help 21them comply with this Section. A person designated as a point 22of contact under this Section shall, upon designation, be 23required to complete an initial orientation and, thereafter, 24shall be encouraged to participate in annual briefings. The 25individual shall be eligible to receive professional 26development hours for both the initial orientation and   HB3096 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 10900 LNS 20982 b1subsequent annual briefings, as applicable. 2    A school district must award a high school diploma to a 3student who is unable to meet the requirements of subsection 4(a) due to extenuating circumstances, as determined by the 5school district, if (i) the student has met all other 6graduation requirements under this Code and (ii) the principal 7attests that the school district has made a good faith effort 8to assist the student or, if applicable, his or her parent or 9guardian in filing an application or a waiver under subsection 10(a).11    (c) The State Board of Education may adopt rules to 12implement this Section.13(Source: P.A. 101-180, eff. 6-1-20; 102-558, eff. 8-20-21.) 14    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 15becoming law.